District of Columbia statutes.
2-1516.01

Repealed

Youth Jobs Fund.

Repealed.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1009, 55 DCR 7598
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9016, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9016 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9016 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9016 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Short title: Section 1008 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle D of title I of the act may be cited as the “Youth Jobs Fund Establishment Act of 2008”.
Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9016 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.